test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-poorrad_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - poorrâd: # Verb 'to eat' - full paradigm
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pooram
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: poorak
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: påårr
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: poorrâp
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: poorrveʹted
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: påʹrre
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: poorât
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: poʹrrem
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: poʹrriǩ
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: poori
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [poorim, poorin]
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: poorid
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: poʹrre
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: poʹrreš
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg1: pooržem
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg2: pooržiǩ
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg3: poorâž
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Pl1: [pooržep, pooržim, pooržin]
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Pl2: pooržid
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Pl3: poorže
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg4: pooržet
     poorrâd+V+Pot+ConNeg: poorže
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg1: poorčem
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg2: poorčiǩ
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg3: poorči
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Pl1: [poorčim, poorčin, poorčep]
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Pl2: poorčid
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Pl3: poorče
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg4: poorčeš
     poorrâd+V+Cond+ConNeg: poorče
     poorrâd+V+Imprt+Sg2: poor
     poorrâd+V+Imprt+Sg3: pååras
     poorrâd+V+Imprt+Pl1: poorrâp
     poorrâd+V+Imprt+Pl2: poorrâd
     poorrâd+V+Imprt+Pl3: pårraz
     poorrâd+V+Imprt+ConNegII: porru
     poorrâd+V+Actio+Ess: poorrmen
     poorrâd+V+Actio: poorrâm
     poorrâd+V+Act+PrsPrc: poorri
     poorrâd+V+Act+PrfPrc: poorrâm
     poorrâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc: porrum
     poorrâd+V+VAbess: [poorkani, poorǩani, poorǩâni, poorǩeânai, poorkâni]
     poorrâd+V+Ger+Ess: pooreen
     poorrâd+V+Ger+Instr: pooreeʹl
